Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 2. Powers and Duties.

Sec. 19.75.111.
Powers and duties of the authority.

In furtherance of its purposes, the authority may

operate the Knik Arm bridge and its appurtenant facilities;

sue and be sued;

adopt a seal;

adopt, amend, and repeal regulations under AS 44.62 and establish bylaws;

make and execute agreements, contracts, and all other instruments with any public or private person, the state or another governmental unit or agency, corporation, or other business entity lawfully conducting business in the United States for the exercise of its powers and functions under this chapter and for the operation of facilities, properties, or projects of the authority, including making and executing contracts with any person, firm, corporation, the state or another governmental agency, or other entity;

in its own name acquire, lease, rent, sell, or convey real and personal property;

apply for and accept gifts, grants, or loans from a federal agency or an agency or instrumentality of the state, or from a municipality, private organization, or other source, including obtaining title to state, local government, or privately owned land, directly or through a department of the state having jurisdiction of the land;

collect fees, rents, tolls, rates, or other charges for the use of the Knik Arm bridge and appurtenant facilities;

bring civil actions, refer criminal actions to the appropriate authority, and take other actions or enter into agreements with law enforcement and collection agencies to enforce the collection of its fees, rents, tolls, rates, other charges, penalties, and other obligations;

pledge, encumber, transfer, or otherwise obligate revenue derived by the authority from the ownership, use, or operation of toll facilities, including fees, rents, tolls, rates, charges, or other revenue of the authority or money that the legislature may appropriate, except a state tax or license, as security for indebtedness or agreements of the authority or for bonds or other indebtedness or agreements of the state on a senior, parity, or subordinate lien basis;

deposit or invest its funds;

procure insurance against any loss in connection with its operation;

contract for and engage the services of consultants, experts, and financial and technical advisors that the authority considers necessary for the exercise of its powers and functions under this chapter;

confer with municipal and other governments, metropolitan planning organizations, and the department, concerning the Knik Arm bridge;

do all acts and things necessary to carry out the powers expressly granted in this chapter.

The authority shall

prepare an annual report of its operations to include a balance sheet, an income statement, a statement of changes in financial position, a reconciliation of changes in equity accounts, a summary of significant accounting principles, an auditor’s report, comments regarding the year’s business, and prospects for the next year; the report shall be completed by the third day of each regular session of the legislature, and the authority shall notify the governor, the commissioner of the department, the presiding officers of each house of the legislature, and the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee that the report is available;

comply with the provisions of AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act), except that AS 37.07 does not apply to the activities of the authority that relate to the authority’s borrowing of money as provided in this chapter;

establish a personnel management system for hiring employees and setting employee-benefit packages;

establish procedures, rules, and rates governing per diem and travel expenses of the employees of the authority in substantial conformity to statutes, procedures, rules, and rates applicable to state employees of similar state entities;

coordinate the exercise of its power to operate the Knik Arm bridge with the department, and with the mayors of the Municipality of Anchorage and the Matanuska-Susitna Borough.

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 60 SLA 2006; am §§ 5, 6 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.90.111. Renumbered in 2003.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in the introductory language in (a), deleted “Except as otherwise explicitly made applicable to the authority, the performance of the authority’s duties and the exercise of its powers, including its powers to issue bonds and otherwise incur debt, shall be governed exclusively by this chapter.”, in the introductory language in (a)(1), deleted “Own, acquire, construct, develop, create, reconstruct, equip,” at the beginning, and “, maintain extend, and improve” preceding “the Knik Arm bridge”, in the introductory language in (a)(5), inserted “the state or another” twice and deleted “financing, design, construction, maintenance, improvement, or” following “under this chapter and for the” and “for the purpose of” at the end and deleted (a)(5)(A) and (B), which related to incurring indebtedness, investments, partnerships and contracts, deleted (a)(7) and (8), which related to issuing and refunding bonds and incurring other indebtedness, in (a)(10, deleted “fix and” at the beginning, and “, or for a service developed, operated, or provided by the authority; notwithstanding AS 37 10.050(a), fees, rents, tolls, rates, and other charges fixed and collected under this paragraph may exceed the actual operating cost of the use of the bridge, facility, or service”
following “appurtenant facilities”, at the end of (a)(10), added “or for bonds or other indebtedness or agreements of the state on a senior, parity, or subordinate lien basis”, at the end of (a)(11) deleted “, subject to agreements with bondholders”, deleted (a)(16) — (18), related to permits, licenses, and approvals, reconnaissance studies and surveys, exercise of eminent domain, and in (a)(15) deleted “or necessarily implied” following “expressly granted” and “, nothing in this chapter limits the powers of the authority that are expressly granted or necessarily implied” at the end; in (b), in (b)(2), deleted “, including the issuing of its obligations or evidence of that borrowing and the repayment of the debt obligation” at the end, in (b)(5), substituted “its power to operate the Knik Arm bridge” for “its powers to plan, design, construct, operate, and maintain the Knik Arm bridge”, deleted (b)(6), which related to determining fees, rents, tolls, rates and other charges.

Sec. 19.75.113.
Assets, funds, and revenue of the authority.

The Department of Revenue shall separately account for all funds, assets, and revenue of the authority.

The deposit or investment of money in the authority’s funds may be made as the board determines. The interest earned on or profits derived from the deposit, investment, or sale of an investment by the authority are funds of the authority.

History.

(§ 2 ch 60 SLA 2006)

Secs. 19.75.211 — 19.75.251.
Bonds of the authority; trust indentures and trust agreements; funds and reserves; validity of pledge; nonliability on bonds; pledge of the state. [Repealed, § 13 ch 51 SLA 2014.]

Sec. 19.75.261.
Exemption from taxation.

The real and personal property of the authority and its assets, income, and receipts are declared to be the property of a political subdivision of the state and are exempt from all taxes and special assessments of the state or a political subdivision of the state. Nothing in this section affects or limits an exemption from license fees, property taxes, or excise, income, or other taxes provided under any other law, nor does it create a tax exemption with respect to the interest of any business enterprise or other person, other than the authority, in any property, assets, income, receipts, project, or lease, regardless of whether financed under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 2003; am § 7 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.90.261. Renumbered in 2003.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, deleted the second and third sentences, which read, “All bonds of the authority are declared to be issued by a political subdivision of the state and for an essential public and governmental purpose. The bonds, the interest on the bonds, the income from the bonds and the transfer of the bonds, and all assets, income, and receipts pledged to pay or secure the payment of the bonds or interest on the bonds, are, at all times, exempt from taxation by or under the authority of the state, except for inheritance and estate taxes and taxes on transfers by or in contemplation of death.”

Sec. 19.75.271.
Bonds legal investments for fiduciaries. [Repealed, § 13 ch 51 SLA 2014.]

Sec. 19.75.281.
Audit.

The legislative auditor annually shall audit, or cause to have audited, the financial records of the authority. The legislative auditor may prescribe the form and content of the financial records of the authority and shall have access to these records at any reasonable time.

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.90.281. Renumbered in 2003.

Sec. 19.75.291.
State appropriations for Knik Arm bridge and appurtenant facilities not affected.

This chapter does not prevent the state from making appropriations for or in aid of the operation of the Knik Arm bridge and its appurtenant facilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 2003; am § 8 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.90.291. Renumbered in 2003.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, deleted “acquisition, design, construction, or” following “in aid of the”.

Sec. 19.75.301.
Insurance.

The authority shall keep in force public liability insurance in an amount reasonably calculated to cover potential claims for bodily injury, death or disability, and property damage that may arise from or be related to its operation and activities, naming the state as an additional insured.

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.90.301. Renumbered in 2003.

Sec. 19.75.311.
Safeguarding of money.

The authority shall maximize revenue from and deposit all money in depositories acceptable to the commissioner of revenue and otherwise safeguard the money under instructions as the commissioner of revenue may from time to time issue.

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.90.311. Renumbered in 2003.

Sec. 19.75.321.
Fidelity bond.

The authority shall obtain a fidelity bond in an amount determined by the board, for the members of the board and any official responsible for authority accounts and finances. A bond must be in effect for the tenure of the bonded person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.90.321. Renumbered in 2003.

Secs. 19.75.330 — 19.75.
340. Bond terms; bond resolution; enforcement by holder; bond negotiability; refunding; bonds as legal investments. [Repealed, § 13 ch 51 SLA 2014.]

Sec. 19.75.360.
Transfer of Knik Arm bridge.

If the department constructs the Knik Arm bridge and appurtenant facilities, the department shall transfer control of the bridge and appurtenant facilities to the authority, and the authority shall operate the bridge and appurtenant facilities. After the transfer of control, the department retains ownership of the bridge, appurtenant facilities, and real property, and retains the power to reconstruct, equip, extend, maintain, or improve the bridge and appurtenant facilities.

History.

(§ 9 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 15, ch. 51, SLA 2014 makes this section effective July 1, 2014.